Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin EQUINE-EXPERIENTIAL MENTAL HEALTH THERAPY FOR FIRST RESPONDERS; APPROPRIATION; REPORTING.new text end new text begin (a) $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to 7 Stars Ranch to provide equine-experiential mental health therapy to first responders suffering from job-related trauma and post-traumatic stress disorder. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, a "first responder" is an active or retired: new text end new text begin (1) peace officer as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (2) full-time firefighter as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 299N.03, subdivision 5; new text end new text begin (3) volunteer firefighter as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 299N.03, subdivision 7; new text end new text begin (4) ambulance service personnel as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 144E.001, subdivision 3a; new text end new text begin (5) 911 telecommunicator as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 403.02, subdivision 17c; or new text end new text begin (6) correctional officer as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 241.026, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (c) 7 Stars Ranch must report to the commissioner of employment and economic development and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over employment and economic development policy and finance on the equine-experiential mental health therapy provided to first responders under this section. The report must include an overview of the program's budget, a detailed explanation of program expenditures, the number of first responders served by the program, and a list and explanation of the services provided to and benefits received by program participants. An initial report is due by January 15, 2026, and a final report is due by January 15, 2028. new text end